Utah statutes.
48-2c-503.   Timing.

An operating agreement may be entered into before, at the time of, or after the filing of the articles of organization.  Regardless of the timing, the agreement may, by its own terms, be effective upon formation of the company or at a later designated time or date, provided, however, that the operating agreement may not become effective prior to formation of the company.

